Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-202
Reservation of power to amend or repeal.

(MBCA 1.02) The Legislature
has power to amend or repeal all or part of the Nebraska Model Business Corporation
Act at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to the act
are governed by the amendment or repeal.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 2.